Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.235

Certificate of existence or registration—Definitions.

(1) On request of any person, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of existence for a domestic entity or a certificate of registration for a registered foreign entity.

(2) A certificate under subsection (1) of this section must state:

(a) The domestic entity's name or the registered foreign entity's name used in this state;

(b) In the case of a domestic entity:

(i) That its public organic record has been filed and has taken effect;

(ii) The date the public organic record became effective;

(iii) The period of the entity's duration if the records of the secretary of state reflect that the entity's period of duration is less than perpetual; and

(iv) That the records of the secretary of state do not reflect that the entity has been dissolved;

(c) In the case of a registered foreign entity:

(i) That it is registered to do business in this state;

(ii) The date the foreign entity registered to do business in this state; and

(iii) That the records of the secretary of state do not reflect that the foreign entity's registration to do business in the state has been terminated;

(d) That all fees, interest, and penalties owed to this state by the domestic or foreign entity and collected through the secretary of state have been paid, if:

(i) Payment is reflected in the records of the secretary of state; and

(ii) Nonpayment affects the existence or registration of the domestic or foreign entity;

(e) That the most recent annual report required by RCW 23.95.255 has been delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

(f) That a proceeding is not pending under RCW 23.95.610 as to a domestic entity or under RCW 23.95.550 as to a registered foreign entity; and

(g) Other facts reflected in the records of the secretary of state pertaining to the domestic or foreign entity which the person requesting the certificate reasonably requests.

(3) Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate issued by the secretary of state under subsection (1) of this section may be relied upon as conclusive evidence of the facts stated in the certificate, and that as of the date of its issuance: (a) In the case of a domestic entity, it is in existence and duly formed or incorporated, as applicable; and (b) in the case of a foreign entity, it is registered and authorized to do business in this state.

(4) The terms "doing business" and "transacting business," and their variants such as "do business" and "transact business," are used interchangeably, and each has the same meaning as the other when used in this title and in Titles 23B, 24, and 25 RCW.

[ 2017 c 31 s 1; 2015 c 176 s 1208.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.